ro-RO: Formă brățară: În formă de D; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; Lacrimă; Altele
pl: Kształt obręczy: w kształcie litery D; Prostokąt; Runda; Łza; Inne
nb: Bøyleform: D-formet; Rektangel; Rund; Teardrop; Annet
th: รูปทรงของห่วง: รูปตัว D; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; หยดน้ำตา; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Oblika obroča: V obliki črke D; Pravokotna; Okrogla; Kaplja; Drugo
el: Σχήμα στεφάνης: Σε σχήμα D; Ορθογώνιο παραλληλόγραμμο; Στρογγυλό; Δάκρυ; Άλλο
ru: Форма обруча: D-образный; Прямоугольный; Круглый; Каплевидный; Другой
hr-HR: Oblik obruča: U obliku slova D; Pravokutni; Okrugli; Suza; Ostalo
zh-CN: 环形: D 形; 长方形; 圆头; 泪滴状; 其他
da: Bøjleform: D-formet; Rektangel; Rund; Tåre; Andet
nl: Hoepelvorm: D-vorm; Rechthoek; Rond; Traan; Andere
es: Forma del aro: En forma de D; Rectángulo; Redondo; Lágrima; Otros
hu: Karika alakja: D alakú; Szögletes; Kerek; Könnycsepp; Egyéb
pt-PT: Forma do aro: Em forma de D; Retângulo; Redondo; Em forma de lágrima; Outro
en: Hoop shape: D-shaped; Rectangle; Round; Teardrop; Other
pt-BR: Tamanho do gancho: Em forma de D; Retângulo; Redondo; Mini-trailer; Outro
fi: Renkaan muoto: D-muotoinen; Suorakulmio; Pyöreä; Kyynel; Muu
tr: Çember şekli: D şekilli; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Gözyaşı; Diğer
cs: Tvar ok: Tvar písmene D; Obdélník; Oválná; Slza; Jiné
sv: Ringform: D-formad; Rektangel; Rund; Teardrop; Övrigt
vi: Hình vòng: Hình chữ D; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày tròn; Nhỏ gọn; Khác
ja: フープの形状: D型; 長方形; ラウンド; ティアドロップ; その他
zh-TW: 環形: D 型; 長方; 圓頭; 淚珠; 其他
fr: Forme du cerceau: En forme de D; Rectangle; Rond; Mini-caravane; Autre
de: Reifenform: D-förmig; Rechteck; Rund; Träne; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Tvar obruče: V tvare písmena D; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Slza; Iné
ko: 후프 모양: D자형; 직사각형; 라운드; 티어드롭; 기타
it: Forma del canestro: A forma di D; Rettangolo; Rotondo; Goccia; Altro
bg-BG: Форма на обръч: D-образна; Правоъгълник; Кръгла; Teardrop; Други
lt-LT: Lanko forma: D formos; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Lašo formos; Kita